District of Columbia statutes.
34-1253.03

Public Service Commission regulation of the use of existing utility companies’ rights-of-way.

(a)

The Public Service Commission shall regulate the rates, terms, and conditions for cable operators’ use of existing utility company rights-of-way located within the District, including the use of existing utility poles and underground conduits in accordance with federal law and regulations, and shall ensure that all rates, terms, and conditions are just and reasonable.

(b)

In regulating rates, terms, and conditions under this section, the Public Service Commission shall consider the interests of both cable service subscribers and utility consumers.

(c)

The Public Service Commission shall resolve disagreements among cable operators and public utilities, including the use of public rights-of-way by a cable operator to install and maintain the cable operator’s cable system.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 303
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334